Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 49-15-25.
Advisory council may be appointed by commission.

The commission may appoint an advisory council of persons who may fairly be regarded as representative of all the various segments of the industry. This council shall aid the commission in formulating policies and discussing problems related to the administration of this chapter and the advancement and protection of the industry.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-14; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).

§ 49-15-27.
Commission granted authority to lease bottoms.

The commission is hereby granted full and complete authority to lease the bottoms within its jurisdiction upon the following terms and conditions:

All areas within the commission’s jurisdiction, not designated tonging reefs by this chapter, or hereinafter designated tonging reefs by the commission; all areas not designated natural reefs by the commission, and all areas not within the boundaries of riparian property owners may be leased by the commission.

All individual lessees shall be residents of the State of Mississippi, or if a firm or corporation, such firm or corporation shall be organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi.

No individual, corporation, partnership or association may lease less than five (5) acres nor more than five hundred (500) acres; however, in the case of an individual there shall not be counted towards such limitation any lands leased by a corporation, partnership or association in which such individual owns ten percent (10%) or less interest and, in the case of a corporation, partnership or association, there shall not be counted toward such limitation any lands leased by an individual stockholder, partner or associate thereof who owns ten percent (10%) or less interest in such corporation, partnership or association.

Individuals, firms or corporations desiring to lease bottoms shall make application to the commission in writing, describing the area to be leased.

The commission shall consider bottom leasing applications in the order in which each is filed and may award, within sixty (60) days, a lease to the area described in the application upon payment of the rent in advance.

Such leases shall be for a term of five (5) years, with the right of lessee to renew the lease for an additional five (5) years, and continue to renew at five-year intervals, at the same ground rental rate so long as lessee actively cultivates and gathers oysters, and complies with the provisions of this chapter. No lease may be transferred without approval by the commission of the transfer.

The commission shall fix a ground rental at not less than Five Dollars ($5.00) per acre.

The commission shall keep an accurate chart of the areas within its jurisdiction and shall mark on such chart those areas which are under lease. All leases shall be marked by appropriate poles, stakes or buoys of such material as will not injure watercraft, at the expense of the leaseholder. The commission shall keep an accurate book, designated “Mississippi Oyster Farms” which shall contain copies of all leases. If any lease be cancelled or expire, such fact shall be noted on the face of such lease. Lessees shall be “oyster farmers” for the purposes of any grants, aid, subsidies or other assistance from the federal government or other governmental or private agencies.

All funds derived from leasing shall be paid into the Seafood Fund under Section 49-15-17, for use by the commission to further oyster production in this state, which includes plantings of oysters and cultch materials.

All leases made by the commission under the authority of this section shall be subject to the paramount right of the state and any of its political subdivisions authorized by law, to promote and develop ports, harbors, channels, industrial or recreational projects, and all such leases shall contain a provision that in the event such authorized public body shall require the area so leased or any part thereof for such public purposes, that the lease shall be terminated on reasonable notice fixed by the commission in such lease. On the termination of any lease, the lessees shall have the right to remove any oysters within the leased area within such time as may be fixed by the commission and in accordance with such reasonable rules and regulations as the commission may adopt.

Any person convicted of taking oysters from leased land or from waters that are not of a safe sanitary quality without a permit as provided in Section 49-15-37 shall, on the first offense, forfeit all equipment used, exclusive of any boat or boats; and be fined not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or sentenced not to exceed one (1) year in the county jail, or both. Subsequent convictions shall be punishable by forfeiture of all equipment, including any boat or boats; and a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or not to exceed two (2) years in prison, or both such fine and imprisonment.

The commission is enjoined to cooperate with the Jackson County Port Authority, the Harrison County Development Commission, the municipal port commission and other port and harbor agencies, so that oyster beds shall not be planted in close proximity to navigable channels. The commission or lessee shall have no right of action as against any such public body for damages accruing to any natural reef or leased reef by any necessary improvement of such channel in the interest of shipping, commerce, navigation or other purpose authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-11; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 11; Laws, 1977, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 49-15-28.
Combination seafood dealer and processor license; fees.

Each person buying or handling seafood secured from commercial fishermen, or from other wholesale dealers, for the purpose of resale, whether handling on a commission basis or otherwise, and every resident person shipping seafood out of the State of Mississippi on consignment or order, except fishermen shipping their own catch, shall be considered a wholesale dealer.

Any factory or person engaged in the canning, processing, freezing, drying or shipping of oysters, fish, saltwater crabs or saltwater shrimp shall be considered a seafood processor.

Any person operating as a wholesale dealer, retail dealer or processor of seafood shall obtain an annual combination dealer and processor license for a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).

The license shall be nontransferable and a license shall be required for each factory or place of business.

The combination license shall entitle the licensee to operate as a wholesale dealer, retail dealer and processor.

It is unlawful for any factory or person to engage in the canning, processing, freezing, drying or shipping of oysters, fish, saltwater crabs or saltwater shrimp without first having obtained that license.

This section shall not apply to a dealer in fresh seafoods who merely preserves the seafood for future sale to prevent spoilage and is in competition with other retailers who are not required to pay this tax.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2007.).

§ 49-15-29.
Taxes and license fees to be collected by the commission.

The commission shall assess and collect license fees and taxes as authorized under this chapter.

All commercial licenses provided for under this chapter that relate to seafood shall be purchased from May 1 through April 30 at the fees provided in this chapter. The licenses shall expire on April 30 following the date of issuance.

When an application for an original or renewal license of any kind authorized by this chapter is received by the commission, the commission shall determine whether the vessel or related equipment subject to that license is owned and operated in compliance with applicable federal and state laws. If the commission determines that a vessel or its owner is not in compliance with applicable federal and state laws, then no license shall be issued or renewed for the operation of that vessel for a period of one (1) year. All licenses shall be made available for purchase at any building which is regularly operated by the department or commission on the Mississippi Gulf Coast.

The commission may authorize any person, other than a salaried employee of the state to issue any license under this chapter which the commission deems appropriate. The authorized person may collect and retain for issuance of the license the sum of One Dollar ($1.00) in addition to the license fee provided in this chapter. The commission shall establish the qualifications of persons authorized to issue licenses under this section and shall also establish the procedure for the issuance of that license by the authorized person and the procedure for collection of license fees by and from the authorized person.

The commission may design, establish, and administer a program to provide for the purchase, by electronic means, of any license, permit, registration or reservation issued by the commission or department. Any actual costs associated to provide these documents electronically may be added to the cost of the electronic program.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-18; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 18; Laws, 1975, ch. 321, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 463, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 361; Laws, 1982, ch. 446, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 513; Laws, 1985, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 395, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 398; Laws, 1991, ch. 564, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 550, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 603, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 51; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 28, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 19; Laws, 1999, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 389, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 49-15-30.
Commission may promulgate regulations for nonresident permits, reciprocity; penalties.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations for nonresident permits in order to promote reciprocal agreements with other states.

The commission shall provide that residents of other states bordering on the Gulf of Mexico who are applicants for a commercial fishing license of any type as provided for in this chapter shall pay the same fee or fees that a resident of this state pays in this state for that license if the respective applicant’s domicile state does not charge a greater fee or fees for a Mississippi resident than for a resident of any other state to engage in a like activity in the other state. If the applicant’s domicile state does charge a greater fee or fees for residents of Mississippi than for a resident of the applicant’s domicile state, then that applicant shall pay the same fee or fees that the applicant’s domicile state charges residents of Mississippi.

The commission shall require a nonresident to purchase the same type and number of licenses and pay the same fees that are required of Mississippi residents to engage in like activity in the nonresident’s state.

If an applicant applies for a nonresident commercial fishing license to engage in a certain activity and the applicant’s state does not issue a nonresident commercial fishing license for that activity, then the commission shall not issue such license to the applicant.

If the applicant’s domicile state has additional mandatory licensing requirements, the applicant must meet those requirements before receiving a nonresident commercial fishing license.

Any nonresident who engages in the commercial taking of seafood within the territorial waters of Mississippi without having the required nonresident commercial license is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and shall forfeit any equipment, gear or nets used in the offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 572, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 20; Laws, 1998, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 27, 2017).

§ 49-15-31.
Commission to maintain and operate patrol stations, camps and related facilities; reciprocity.

The commission may construct, maintain and operate all patrol stations, camps and related facilities as may be deemed necessary by the commission.

If a regulatory agency of a foreign state establishes a station or checkpoint through which Mississippi residents must pass for license, permit or catch inspection, or otherwise, the department shall establish similar stations or checkpoints through which residents of the foreign states shall be required to pass.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6051.7; Laws, 1955, Ex. Sess., ch. 121, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1958, ch. 195, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 21, eff from and after July 2, 1997.

§ 49-15-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 572, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1974).

[Codes, 1942, § 6051.9; Laws, 1956, ch. 165; Laws, 1958, ch. 195, § 8]

§ 49-15-34.
Boats used in other states; license and fee requirements; transport permits.

The commission shall require all boats used under regulation of this chapter which are also used in waters of other states and required by those states to pay licenses or fees for the same purposes as licenses and fees are required under this chapter to purchase a license which reflects that the licensed boats are used inside and outside the territorial waters of Mississippi. Upon the issuance of that license, the licensed boat, if used exclusively for commercial fishing or charter boats which have been licensed and authorized by the United States Coast Guard under 46 CFR Sections 24-26 and 46 CFR Sections 175-187, shall be deemed to be in the business of interstate transportation, but this shall in no way affect the collection of other licenses and fees by the commission which would otherwise be due under this chapter. The commission shall assess and collect an annual license fee of Twenty Dollars ($20.00) on each boat engaged in operations under this subsection.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall establish a transport permit to land seafood in this state which is legally taken outside of the Mississippi territorial waters without obtaining a license under this chapter. The commission by regulation shall require the registration of those landings. The commission may establish a permit fee in an amount not to exceed the amount of the license fee established in Section 49-15-28(1). This subsection shall not be construed to supersede Section 49-15-71.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 519, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 49-15-35.
Authority to regulate taking and catching of menhaden.

Upon the request of the boards of supervisors of the respective coastal counties, the commission may adopt ordinances prohibiting the taking and catching of menhaden within certain limits of the coast line of the county so requesting, but the commission shall not fix such limits except upon request of the board of supervisors, and such limit shall not exceed two (2) miles from the shore line, or two (2) miles from the corporate limit boundaries of any municipality bordering on the Mississippi Sound.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6047-17; Laws, 1960, ch. 173, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1960).

§ 49-15-36.
Oyster reefs and bottoms; rotating opening; closing of oyster reefs; special permits for taking oysters during closed season; depuration.

The commission shall have full jurisdiction and control of all public and natural oyster reefs and oyster bottoms of the State of Mississippi. The commission may delegate this authority to the executive director of the department.

Public reefs may be opened for harvest of oysters during the season on a rotating basis. If the commission determines that a particular reef has been over-harvested or that a high percentage of sublegal size oysters exist on a particular reef and that harvest could damage future oyster crops, the commission may close designated reef areas and keep them closed during the season.

The commission shall promulgate regulations regarding the closing of oyster reefs to protect the public health. When that testing indicates the oysters on the closed reef are suitable for consumption, the reef shall be opened for the taking of oysters as soon as notice of that opening may be made to interested parties. The authority to open or close oyster reefs under this chapter shall be solely within the discretion of the commission, acting through the department. The Gulf Coast Research Laboratory or other certified laboratory shall cooperate with the department and shall conduct necessary tests to determine the condition of oyster reefs at the request of the department. The department may limit the sale of oysters for human consumption, but all matters concerning the harvesting of oysters shall be within the jurisdiction of the commission.

The commission may issue special permits for the purpose of catching oysters outside the open season or in areas not normally open to harvest to those nonprofit organizations that are tax exempt under Section 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and which have on file with the Department of Revenue a tax exemption letter issued by the United States Internal Revenue Service.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the taking of oysters by the nonprofit organization and shall issue such regulations to all organizations upon request and at the issuance of the special permit.

The commission shall establish a reasonable period of time for depuration of oysters replanted from restricted waters. That period of time shall be consistent with the maintenance of the public health and may vary from time to time and from one reef to another in accordance with environmental conditions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 509, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-15-37.
Cultivation of oyster reefs; removal of oysters from restricted areas.

By order of the commission, the director, under the direction and control of the commission, shall employ boats, crews and laborers and shall cultivate the public reefs of the state, and shall dredge the oysters in the Mississippi Sound from places where they are too thick, and shall spread them on reefs where they are too thin, and shall carry shells from the factories and spread them in places where the oyster beds can be improved and enlarged. The department may purchase other materials as may be equally suitable for the propagation of oysters. The department in cultivating the reefs, transplanting and spreading oysters and shells and other suitable materials, may expend any funds available for that purpose. In taking seed oysters, care shall be used to not injure or destroy the merchantable oysters on the reefs from which they are taken. The seed oysters shall be tonged from the “conner” or seed reefs, unless it is practicable and safe to dredge those oysters. The commission may, by orders spread on its minutes, establish new bedding grounds at those places within the boundaries of the state as it may determine, on advice of the director, or on advice of technical governmental experts, or competent aquatic biologists. On existing public reefs in which oysters exist and in waters not of a safe sanitary quality as determined by the department, the commission shall prohibit any person, firm or corporation from taking oysters from those areas. The commission shall from time to time remove the oysters from the areas and relay or replant them in an approved area for a period of time under Section 49-15-36 before they may be harvested. The commission may transport the oysters to an onshore, molluscan depuration facility for the purpose of proving depuration technology and for other experimental purposes. In connection with the testing of onshore, molluscan depuration technology, the commission may sell or dispose of the relaid oysters in a manner consistent with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations. Any funds received from the sale of the oysters shall be used in a like manner as those funds received under Section 49-15-38.

If the commission finds that onshore, molluscan depuration technology proves to be successful, the commission may issue permits to private enterprise which may locate depuration facilities in Hancock, Harrison and Jackson Counties. The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations for the taking of oysters from reefs for transport to an onshore, molluscan depuration facility and for the operation of the facilities. Each depuration facility operated by private enterprise shall return oyster shells to the oyster reefs for replanting under the proper supervision of the department and under Section 49-15-38.

The commission may issue permits to persons to remove oysters by dredging or otherwise from water bottoms which are not of a safe sanitary quality for oysters for human consumption even though those areas may have been reserved for tonging only in Section 49-15-39. These areas shall be designated as seed grounds, and permits to persons shall be issued only for the purpose of transplanting oysters to privately leased Mississippi territorial waters. The commission may permit the transplanting of these seed oysters by a duly authorized public agency.

The commission may, upon certification of the department that the water bottom from which oysters are to be removed is not of a safe, sanitary quality for oyster production for human consumption and has been unsafe for a period of at least one (1) year immediately preceding certification, and upon complying with the following requirements, permit the dredging of oysters from restricted public areas and relaying the oysters to private leased grounds in the State of Mississippi:

Permittee must hold valid lease of oyster bedding grounds in the State of Mississippi;

Permittee must be bonded in compliance with the permit system established by the commission;

Permittee must fulfill all permit requirements as established by the commission;

Permittee shall not move oysters from one restricted area to another restricted area;

Permittee shall move oysters only to an area leased by the commission after April 13, 1977; and

Permittee shall not move oysters from the restricted area without the presence of an employee of the department at all times, from the dredging of the oysters from the restricted areas to their deposit on private leased grounds or to an onshore, molluscan depuration facility.

Harvesting of oysters shall be permitted only during daylight hours and with the most efficient gear possible consistent with conservation requirements of not damaging the reefs. This shall include permission to use two (2) dredges per boat on restricted areas and on private leased grounds.

Any person obtaining a permit to remove oysters from seed grounds shall post a penal bond of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per leased acre with the commission to be forfeited upon any violation of this section. The bond may be approved by the director of the department if the director finds the bond to be secured by sufficient property or sureties.

The commission shall regulate the amount and time of taking of oysters from seed areas and shall supervise the removal, planting and harvesting of oysters from the areas. The time set for the taking of oysters from restricted seed areas for relaying or replanting and the time set for the taking of oysters from private leased grounds shall be separated by not less than a period of time determined under Section 49-15-36 during which neither activity may be allowed.

The commission shall regulate the taking of oysters from restricted seed areas and the subsequent depuration of the oysters to protect public health, while at the same time fostering the utilization of the state’s oyster resources. The regulations shall include the setting of the period of depuration for the oysters by the use of appropriate techniques and provide for an employee of the department to be present when the oysters are taken from restricted seed areas, and transported, held and deposited on private lease grounds. Any person, firm, corporation or private lease holder engaged in the depuration of oysters shall pay to the department an amount equal to the regular compensation of the employee of the department for the time the employee actually spends performing the duties, not to exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) per twenty-four-hour period.

Only persons who have been residents of Mississippi for at least five (5) years shall be eligible to obtain permits for removal of oysters from seed grounds.

The commission shall designate certain reefs in the state as public reefs and shall remove oysters from water bottoms which are not of a safe, sanitary quality for oyster production for human consumption and shall transport the oysters to the public reefs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3505; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6147; 1930, § 6874; 1942, § 6072; Laws, 1902, ch. 58; Laws, 1948, ch. 474, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 195, § 37; Laws, 1974, ch. 572, § 8; Laws, 1977, ch. 463, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 429; Laws, 1987, ch. 521, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 395, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 399, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 22; Laws, 2004, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 307, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 14, 2006.).

§ 49-15-38.
Culling requirements; collection and planting of shells; penalties and fees for failure to deliver shells.

Unless otherwise permitted by the commission, no oysters shall be taken from the reefs of this state unless culled upon the natural reefs, and all oysters less than three (3) inches from end to end, and all dead shells, shall be replaced, scattered and broadcast immediately on the natural reefs from which they are taken. It is unlawful for any captain or person in charge of any vessel, or any canner, packer, commission man, dealer or other person to purchase, sell or to have in that person’s possession or under that person’s control any oysters off the public reefs or private bedding grounds not culled according to this section, or any oysters under the legal size. A ten percent (10%) tolerance shall be allowed in relation to any culling.

The commission may authorize the culling of oysters of a lesser measure. That authorization shall be in response to special circumstances or extreme natural conditions affecting the habitat, including, but not limited to, flooding. The department may establish checkpoints in any area within its jurisdiction to conduct inspections, collect fees and issue tags in the enforcement of this chapter and regulations adopted by the commission.

The commission shall acquire and replant shells, seed oysters and other materials, when funding is available, for the purpose of growing oysters.

Any person, firm or corporation failing or refusing to pay the shell retention fee required under Section 49-15-46 to the department when called for by the department, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each barrel of shells for which they fail or refuse to tender the shell retention fee. In addition to the fine, the violator shall pay the reasonable value of the oyster shells and shall be ineligible to be licensed for any activity set forth in this chapter for a period of two (2) years from the date of conviction.

The planting of oyster shells as provided under this chapter shall be under the direction and supervision of the executive director of the department. The governing authorities of each county and municipality bordering upon the Mississippi Sound may assist the commission in the planting and replanting of oyster shells.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 5; Laws 1998, ch. 480, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 519, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 333, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2008.).

§ 49-15-39.
Dredging limits; reefs reserved for tonging; penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to catch or take oysters by means of dredging in any of the waters designated as tonging reefs by the commission.

The commission shall designate certain areas as tonging reefs. The commission shall mark the boundaries of the areas designated by appropriate poles, stakes or buoys of material that will not injure watercraft. The commission may authorize the taking of oysters on reefs designated as tonging reefs by dredge, drag or scoop if the commission finds that the dredging, dragging or scooping is necessary to manage the resource properly. Any dredging, dragging or scooping authorized under this section shall be for a specific time period as provided by the commission.

Unless otherwise authorized under this section, any boat or vessel which catches or takes oysters by means of dredges, drags or scoops, other than hand tongs, from any of the areas described in this section, or with a dredge or dredges in the water, shall have all oysters on board the boat or vessel declared to be contraband. The oysters shall be taken and confiscated by the department or any marine law enforcement officer without court procedure. The captain and crew of the boat or vessel, promptly upon being ordered so to do, shall transport the oysters to a point on the public reefs of the state where the boat or vessel is found and there scatter the oysters according to the instructions of the enforcement officers.

A violation of this section is punishable by a fine of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). For a second offense when the offense is committed within a period of three (3) years from the first offense, the violation is punishable by a fine of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). For a third or subsequent offense when the offense is committed within a period of three (3) years from the first offense, the violation is punishable by a fine of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00).

In addition, upon conviction of a third or subsequent offense within three (3) years of the first offense, it shall be the duty of the court to revoke the license of the convicted party and of the vessel used in the offense, and no license shall be issued to that person or for the vessel to engage in the catching or taking of any seafood from the waters of this state for a period of one (1) year following the conviction.

The fine imposed under this section shall not be suspended or reduced.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6162; 1930, § 6880; 1942, § 6075-12; Laws, 1913, ch. 4; Laws, 1926, ch. 295; Laws, 1944, ch. 287, § 3; Laws, 1950, ch. 553; Laws, 1958, ch. 195, § 52; Laws, 1977, ch. 463, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 399, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 524, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 49-15-40.
Projects to create or establish new oyster beds; molluscan depuration facilities; lease of water bottoms to political subdivisions.

The commission may support projects in the nature of digging or constructing canals or ditches to bring additional water to existing oyster reefs or beds in need of that water, or for the purpose of creating or establishing new oyster reefs or beds. All reefs created or established under this section shall be public reefs. The commission may expend any monies as it deems necessary and expedient to participate in the digging of those canals. The commission may also enter into interstate or intrastate efforts to support these projects and may seek and utilize aid from all federal, state and local sources in this endeavor. To aid in the construction of any canals or ditches, the commission may exercise the right of eminent domain in the manner provided by law.

The commission may construct, operate and maintain onshore, molluscan facilities using any federal or special funds, other than general funds, for the purpose of testing and proving technology relating to oysters and other shellfish. In connection with the construction, operation and maintenance of the facilities, the commission may contract with any persons it deems necessary for the operation, testing, maintenance and evaluation of the facilities, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board. The commission may locate the facilities on any available public properties, subject to the approval of the governing body of that jurisdiction and all other applicable state laws. Once the technology has been tested and proven, the commission may conduct any other tests and experiments with oysters or other shellfish as may be necessary to enhance production or quality of shellfish.

The commission may lease to political subdivisions of the State of Mississippi up to one thousand (1,000) acres of water bottoms for development of oyster reefs and those political subdivisions may permit residents of the State of Mississippi to harvest oysters from the reefs. The political subdivision may charge and receive a fee for each sack of oysters harvested. The commission shall consider and approve the application of a political subdivision after determining that (a) no conflicts exist with sites requested in applications filed before the application of the political subdivision; (b) a fair and reasonable rental payment has been set; and (c) the lease will insure the maximum culture and propagation of oysters.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 6; Laws, 2016, ch. 324, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-15-41.
Oysters not to be caught at night.

It shall be unlawful for any person to fish, catch or take oysters from the waters of Mississippi during the hours between sunset and sunrise of each day.

Violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year in the county jail, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6879; 1942, § 6077; Laws, 1958, ch. 195, § 56; Laws, 1977, ch. 463, § 5; Laws, 2016, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 49-15-42.
Tagging, unloading and transporting of oysters.

All oysters caught in Mississippi territorial waters shall be tagged and unloaded in Mississippi. Before tagging and unloading, the oysters must be sacked or packaged in containers or by other methods approved by the department. However, a person is exempt from the unloading requirement if he is transporting the oysters to a state that has a reciprocity agreement with Mississippi exempting Mississippi residents from the unloading requirements of that state.

The driver of any vehicle used in the transporting of oysters in the shell from outside the territorial limits of the State of Mississippi, whether the vehicle is a boat or motor vehicle, shall possess an invoice, statement or other bill of lading which bears the name of the person, firm or corporation from whom the oysters were purchased, the name of the purchaser and the number of barrels or bushels of oysters which the vehicle or vessel contains.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 463, § 6; Laws, 1982, ch. 446, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1994).

§ 49-15-43.
Packaging of oysters; containers.

Oysters for sale either wholesale or retail may be packaged in glass jars covered with a screw-type top or lid of the type customarily and heretofore used in the seafood industry in the State of Mississippi, but this section shall automatically be repealed if and when such type packaging becomes prohibited by any agency of the United States Government for shipment in interstate commerce.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6085-11; Laws, 1964, ch. 246, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 3, 1964).

§ 49-15-44.
Sale or possession of illegal oysters prohibited; penalties.

The commission shall prohibit the sale or possession of illegal oysters. It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to possess or to engage in the sale of oysters not certified in this state, or to shuck or repack for sale any illegal oysters, unless that person, firm or corporation possesses a bill of sale, valid permit or affidavit of another state, properly dated, evidencing the legality of the sale or possession of the oysters in that state. Any person in possession of illegal oysters shall be subject to civil or criminal prosecution and shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or punished as provided in Section 49-15-63.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 579, § 7, eff from and after July 2, 1997.

§ 49-15-45.
Certain municipalities may enforce oyster laws.

Any municipality bounded by the Gulf of Mexico or Mississippi Sound, which has wholly or partly within its corporate limits, or in the waters adjacent thereto, a public oyster reef reserved for catching oysters exclusively by use of hand tongs, is hereby authorized to aid and cooperate with the commission in enforcing all laws regulating the catching, taking and transporting of oysters, including all of the provisions of this chapter, and all regulations and ordinances of such commission relating to such oyster reefs.

Such municipality may, in its discretion, extend its corporate limits by continuing its boundaries at right angles to the shore line, into the waters of the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico or waters tributary thereto to any line within the boundaries of the State of Mississippi, and may, by ordinance spread upon its minutes, provide that all violations of such laws and ordinances regulating the catching, taking and transporting of oysters shall be violations of the municipal ordinances and punishable as such.

In carrying out the provisions of this section such municipality may purchase, equip and maintain a suitable patrol boat and employ and pay the salaries of a crew to operate same and officers to enforce such laws and ordinances.

Neither prosecutions nor convictions by such municipality shall bar further prosecution and conviction by the commission or its officers for the same offense.

All fines collected by such municipality in enforcing the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the general fund of the municipality and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with this chapter shall be paid out of the general fund of the municipality.

Officers employed or deputized by the municipality to carry out the provisions of this section shall have the right to make arrests without warrant for any violations of the laws, ordinances or regulations referred to in subsection (1) hereof, committed in the presence or in the view of such arresting officer.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed to authorize any municipality to adopt any ordinances regulating catching, taking or transporting oysters. The authority vested in such municipality under this section being limited to enforcement of statutes passed by the Legislature and ordinances and regulations adopted by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6085-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 286, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1958, ch. 195, § 64; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 87, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).